Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-127
Superintendent of institutional schools; qualifications; powers and duties.

(1) On or before December 1, 2020, the Department of Health and Human Services shall establish the position of superintendent of institutional schools to administer the education programs in state institutions under the supervision of the department that house juveniles and shall hire an individual meeting the qualifications required under section 79-801 to fill such position.

(2) The superintendent of institutional schools shall report directly to the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services.

(3) The superintendent of institutional schools shall report annually to the State Board of Education as a requirement for accreditation pursuant to section 79-703 of the education programs in state institutions under the supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services that house juveniles.

(4) Whenever a vacancy arises in the position of superintendent of institutional schools, the Department of Health and Human Services shall expediently hire another individual meeting the qualifications required under section 79-801 to fill such position.

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 14.